District of Columbia statutes.
47-2715

Glenn Dale Hospital rates.

The per diem rate to be charged patients for medical care and service at Glenn Dale Hospital shall be $75.50.

History

Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title IV, § 403, 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-24, § 2(c), 24 DCR 3343
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2715.
1973 Ed., § 47-2215.